Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-2136
Property; exempt from execution.

All property including funds of an authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against such property nor shall judgment against an authority be a charge or lien upon its property. The provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any taxpayer agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (3) of section 18-2147 or any mortgage of an authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees, grants, or revenue.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 16(1), p. 817;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1636;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2636;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 139;

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 12.
July 18, 2026